Rhode Island statutes. Title 7 Corporations, Associations, and Partnerships
Part 4 Name

7-1.2-401.
Corporate name.

The corporate name:

Must contain the word “corporation”, “company”, “incorporated”, or “limited”, or an abbreviation of one of these words.

Shall be distinguishable upon the records of the secretary of state from the name of any entity on file with the secretary of state or a name the exclusive right to which is, at the time filed, reserved or registered in the manner provided in this chapter, or the name of a corporation, whether business or nonprofit, limited partnership, limited-liability partnership or limited-liability company which has in effect a registration of its name as provided in this title, subject to the following:

This provision does not apply if the applicant files with the secretary of state a certified copy of a final decree of a court of competent jurisdiction establishing the prior right of the applicant to the use of the name in this state.

The name may be the same as the name of a corporation or other association the certificate of incorporation or organization of which has been revoked by the secretary of state as permitted by law and the revocation has not been withdrawn within one year from the date of the revocation.

A corporation with which another corporation, domestic or foreign, is merged, or which is formed by the reorganization of one or more domestic or foreign corporations or upon a sale, lease, or other disposition to, or exchange with, a domestic corporation of all or substantially all the assets of another corporation, domestic or foreign, including its name, may have the same name as that used in this state by any of the corporations if at the time the other corporation was organized under the laws of, or is authorized to transact business in, this state.

Words and/or abbreviations that are required by statute to identify the particular type of business entity shall be disregarded when determining if a name is distinguishable upon the records of the secretary of state.

The secretary of state shall promulgate rules and regulations defining the term “distinguishable upon the record” for the administration of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 2004, ch. 216, § 2; P.L. 2004, ch. 274, § 2; P.L. 2005, ch. 36, § 36; P.L. 2005, ch. 72, § 36; P.L. 2005, ch. 120, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 130, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 54, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 60, § 1.

7-1.2-402.
Fictitious business name.

Any corporation organized and existing under the laws of this state or authorized to transact business in this state may transact business in this state under a fictitious name, provided that it files a fictitious business name statement in accordance with this section prior to the time it commences to transact the business under the fictitious name and the fictitious name satisfied the requirements of §

7-1.2-401(a)(2)

.

The fictitious business name statement must be filed with the secretary of state and must be executed by an authorized officer of the corporation and must state:

The fictitious business name to be used;

The name of the applicant corporation and the state or territory under the laws of which it is incorporated, the date of its incorporation, and a brief statement of the business in which it is engaged; and

The address of its registered office within the state.

The fictitious business name statement expires upon the filing of the statement of abandonment of use of a fictitious business name registered in accordance with this section or upon the dissolution of the applicant corporation.

The statement of abandonment of use of a fictitious business name under this section may be filed with the secretary of state on forms furnished by the secretary of state and must be executed by an authorized officer of the corporation and must state:

The fictitious business name being abandoned;

The date on which the original fictitious business name statement being abandoned was filed;

The name of the applicant corporation and the state or territory under the laws of which it is incorporated; and

The address of its registered office within the state.

No domestic or foreign corporation transacting business under a fictitious business name contrary to the provisions of this section, or its assignee, may maintain any action upon or on account of any contract made, or transaction had, in the fictitious business name in any court of this state until a fictitious business name statement has been filed in accordance with this section.

[Deleted by P.L. 2005, ch. 36, § 36 and by P.L. 2005, ch. 72, § 36.]

History of Section.

P.L. 2004, ch. 216, § 2; P.L. 2004, ch. 274, § 2; P.L. 2005, ch. 36, § 36; P.L. 2005, ch. 72, § 36.

7-1.2-403.
Reserved name.

The exclusive right to the use of a corporate name may be reserved by:

Any individual intending to organize a corporation under this chapter.

Any domestic corporation intending to change its name.

Any foreign corporation intending to make application for a certificate of authority to transact business in this state.

Any foreign corporation authorized to transact business in this state and intending to change its name.

Any individual intending to organize a foreign corporation and intending to have the corporation make application for a certificate of authority to transact business in this state.

The reservation is made by filing with the secretary of state an application to reserve a specified corporate name, executed by the applicant. If the secretary of state finds that the name is available for corporate use, the secretary of state shall reserve the name for the exclusive use of the applicant for a non-renewable period of one hundred and twenty (120) days.

The right to the exclusive use of a specified corporate name so reserved may be transferred to any other person by filing in the office of the secretary of state a notice of the transfer, executed by the applicant for whom the name was reserved, and specifying the name and address of the transferee.

History of Section.

P.L. 2004, ch. 216, § 2; P.L. 2004, ch. 274, § 2.

7-1.2-404.
Registered name.

Any corporation organized and existing under the laws of any state or territory of the United States may register its corporate name under this chapter, provided its corporate name is distinguishable upon the records of the secretary of state from the name of any domestic corporation, limited partnership, limited-liability partnership or limited-liability company existing under the laws of this state, or the name of any foreign corporation, limited partnership, limited-liability partnership or limited-liability company authorized to transact business in this state, or any corporate name reserved, filed or registered under this title.

The registration is made by:

Filing with the secretary of state:

An application for registration executed by an authorized officer of the corporation, stating the name of the corporation, the state or territory under the laws of which it is incorporated, the date of its incorporation, a statement that it is carrying on or doing business, and a brief statement of the business in which it is engaged; and

A certificate stating that the corporation is in good standing under the laws of the state or territory wherein it is organized, executed by the secretary of state of the state or territory or by any other official that may have custody of the records pertaining to corporations; and

Paying to the secretary of state a registration fee.

The registration is effective for a period of one year from the effective date of the application.

A corporation, which has in effect a registration of its corporate name, may renew the registration from year to year by annually filing an application for renewal stating the facts required to be stated in an original application for registration and a certificate of good standing as required for the original registration. A renewal application must be filed prior to the expiration of the one-year period from the filing of an original application for registration or its last renewal and extends the registration for the following year.

History of Section.

P.L. 2004, ch. 216, § 2; P.L. 2004, ch. 274, § 2; P.L. 2005, ch. 36, § 36; P.L. 2005, ch. 72, § 36.